Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that acquiring and applying a basic knowledge of personal finance is critical to the economic well-being of all adults. Without this knowledge, persons are much less well-equipped to navigate the complicated financial issues of modern life, including household budgets, consumer debt, loan applications and obligations, and successful retirement planning.The legislature also recognizes that it has taken meaningful steps to support financial education instruction in public schools, including establishing the financial education public-private partnership in 2004, adopting financial education learning standards in 2015, and providing funds in 2022 for financial education professional development for certificated staff.In recognition of the relevance and importance of personal finance knowledge, the ongoing efforts of the financial education public-private partnership, and the ability of public schools to teach or continue teaching financial education instruction, the legislature intends to ensure that all Washington students are provided financial education instruction. Therefore, the legislature intends to make financial education instruction a graduation requirement for public schools.Sec. 2. RCW 28A.300.468 and 2015 c 211 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) After consulting with the financial education public-private partnership, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make available to all school districts a list of instructional materials that align with the financial education standards ((integrated into the state learning standards pursuant to RCW 28A.300.460(2)(d)))adopted in RCW 28A.300.469.(2) School districts, through the end of the 2027-28 school year, shall provide all students in grades nine through ((twelve))12 the opportunity to access the financial education standards, whether through a regularly scheduled class period; before or after school; during lunch periods; at library and study time; at home; via online learning opportunities; through career and technical education course equivalencies; or other opportunities. School districts shall publicize the availability of financial education opportunities to students and their families. School districts are encouraged to grant credit toward high school graduation to students who successfully complete financial education courses.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) Beginning in or before the 2027-28 school year, each school district that operates a high school shall provide all high school students with instruction in the state financial education learning standards adopted in RCW 28A.300.469.(b) Beginning no later than the 2027-28 school year, school districts shall publicize the offering of financial education instruction, and the associated graduation requirement, to students and their parents or legal guardians.(2)(a) Beginning with the graduating class of 2031, each student must meet the high school state financial education learning standards adopted in RCW 28A.300.469 to graduate from high school.(b) Students in grade 12 who have not been able to meet the graduation requirement in (a) of this subsection (2) because of previous residence outside the state may have this requirement waived by their principal. Waivers provided in accordance with this subsection (2)(b) may only be issued on an individual basis.(3)(a) The state board of education shall review and monitor financial education offerings to ensure school district compliance with the requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section. The reviews and monitoring required by this subsection (3) may be conducted concurrently with other oversight and monitoring conducted by the state board of education.(b) The state board of education, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, shall provide a summary of the information collected under this subsection (3) for school years 2027-28 and 2028-29 to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 10, 2030.(4) Nothing in this section is intended to modify or otherwise effect school district requirements adopted prior to January 1, 2025, that obligate graduating students to meet requirements for financial education instruction that are consistent with the state financial education learning standards adopted in RCW 28A.300.469.(5) This section governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and 28A.715.020, and applies to charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW to the same extent as it applies to school districts.(6) Actions of the charter school commission performed in accordance with this section must be completed within existing funds.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. (1) By December 15, 2025, school districts shall submit to the state board of education and the financial education public-private partnership established in RCW 28A.300.450:(a) A list of courses and other learning opportunities offered on financial education for high school students in their school district during or prior to the 2024-25 school year, and the number of students served by those offerings; and(b) A description of what the school district may need to ensure that students are able to meet the graduation requirement in section 3 of this act.(2)(a) The financial education public-private partnership shall analyze the information provided under subsection (1) of this section and create a statewide implementation plan for the graduation requirement in section 3 of this act.(b) The implementation plan, which must be submitted to the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, and, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2026, may include recommendations for:(i) Additional funding for grants to integrate financial literacy education into professional development for certificated staff; and(ii) Other school district resources in accordance with submissions received under subsection (1)(a) of this section.(3) This section governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and 28A.715.020, and applies to charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW to the same extent as it applies to school districts.(4) Actions of the charter school commission performed in accordance with this section must be completed within existing funds.(5) This section expires August 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. (1) The state board of education shall recommend adjustments to graduation requirements and other education offerings to ensure that students have adequate opportunities to meet the graduation requirement in section 3 of this act. In developing the recommendations, the state board shall:(a) Consult with the financial education public-private partnership established in RCW 28A.300.450, students, parents and legal guardians, educators, K-12 education partners, postsecondary partners, employers, and community members; and(b) Consider how to incorporate the graduation requirement in section 3 of this act into the framework of graduation requirements, including consideration of credit options and competency-based options.(2) The state board of education shall, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, report its recommendations to the governor and the education committees of the legislature by December 31, 2026.(3) For purposes of fiscal efficiency, consultations conducted in accordance with this section must be conducted concurrently with other actions of the state board of education that are related to graduation requirements and were initiated prior to March 1, 2025.(4) This section expires August 1, 2027.--- END ---